de: Sprechanlage-Verkabelungstyp: 2-adrig; 4-adrig; 6-Draht; 8-adrig; Bus (digital); Koaxial; Ethernet; Hybrid; IP; HF; Kabellos; Sonstiges
tr: İnterkom kablolama tipi: 2 telli; 4 telli; 6 kablolu; 8 telli; Bus (dijital); Koaksiyel; Ethernet; Hibrit; IP; RF; Kablosuz; Diğer
sl-SI: Tip ožičenja domofona: 2-žična; 4-žična; 6-žilna; 8-žična; Vodilo (digitalno); Koaksialna; Ethernet; Hibridni; IP; RF; Brezžično; Drugo
el: Τύπος καλωδίωσης ενδοεπικοινωνίας: 2 καλωδίων; 4 καλωδίων; 6 καλώδια; 8 καλωδίων; Δίαυλος (ψηφιακός); Ομοαξονικό καλώδιο; Ethernet; Υβριδικό; IP; RF; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Άλλο
nl: Intercom bedradingstype: 2-draads; 4-draads; 6-draads; 8-draads; Bus (digitaal); Coaxiaal; Ethernet; Hybride; IP; RF; Draadloos; Andere
da: Intercom-ledningstype: 2-tråd; 4-tråd; 6-leder; 8-tråd; Bus (digital); Koaksial; Ethernet; Hybrid; IP; RF; Trådløs; Andet
vi: Loại dây intercom: 2 dây; 4 dây; 6 dây; 8 dây; Bus (kỹ thuật số); Đồng trục; Ethernet; Kết hợp; IP; RF; Không dây; Khác
es: Tipo de cableado del intercomunicador: 2 cables; 4 cables; 6 hilos; 8 cables; Bus (digital); Coaxial; Ethernet; Híbrido; IP; RF; Inalámbrico; Otros
ru: Тип проводки домофона: 2-проводная; 4-проводная; 6-проводной; 8-проводная; Шина (цифровая); Коаксиальный; Ethernet; Гибридные; IP; РЧ; Беспроводной; Другой
pt-BR: Tipo de fiação do interfone: 2 fios; 4 fios; 6 fios; 8 fios; Barramento (digital); Coaxial; Ethernet; Híbrido; IP; RF; Sem fio; Outro
fr: Type de câblage de l’intercom: 2 fils; 4 fils; 6 fils; 8 fils; Bus (numérique); Coaxiale; Ethernet; Hybride; IP; RF; Sans fil; Autre
nb: Intercom kablingstype: 2-tråds; 4-tråds; 6-tråds; 8-tråds; Buss (digital); Koaksial; Ethernet; Hybrid; IP; RF; Trådløs; Annet
ko: 인터콤 배선 유형: 2선; 4선; 6선식; 8선; 버스 (디지털); 동축; 이더넷; 하이브리드; IP; RF; 무선; 기타
fi: Puhelinjärjestelmän johdotustyyppi: 2-johtoinen; 4-johtoinen; 6-johtiminen; 8-johtoinen; Väylä (digitaalinen); Koaksiaalinen; Ethernet; Hybridi; IP; Radiotaajuus; Langattomat; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta ožičenja interfona: 2-žilni; 4-žilni; 6-žični; 8-žilni; Sabirnica (digitalna); Koaksijalna veza; Ethernet; Hibridni; IP; RF; Bežična; Ostalo
zh-TW: 對講機佈線類型: 2 線式; 4 線式; 6 線式; 8 線式; 總線（數位）; 同軸; 乙太網路; 混合; IP; 射頻; 無線; 其他
pl: Typ okablowania interkomu: 2-przewodowa; 4-przewodowa; 6-żyłowy; 8-przewodowa; Magistrala (cyfrowa); Współosiowy; Ethernet; Hybrydowy; IP; RF; Bezprzewodowy; Inne
hu: Kaputelefon vezetékezési típusa: 2 vezetékes; 4 vezetékes; 6 vezetékes; 8 vezetékes; Busz (digitális); Koaxiális; Ethernet; Hibrid; IP; RF; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de fiação do intercomunicador: 2 fios; 4 fios; 6 fios; 8 fios; Bus (digital); Coaxial; Ethernet; Híbrido; IP; RF; Sem fios; Outro
th: ประเภทการเดินสายอินเตอร์คอม: 2 สาย; 4 สาย; 6 สาย; 8 สาย; บัส (ดิจิทัล); โคแอกเซียล; อีเทอร์เน็ต; ไฮบริด; IP; RF; แบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 对讲机接线类型: 2 线; 4 线; 6 线; 8 线; 总线（数字）; 同轴; 以太网; 混合; IP; 射频; 无线; 其他
cs: Typ kabeláže interkomu: 2vodičový; 4vodičový; 6-vodič; 8vodičový; Sběrnice (digitální); Koaxiální; Ethernet; Hybridní; IP; RF; Bezdrátové; Jiné
it: Tipo di cablaggio interfono: 2 fili; 4 fili; 6 fili; 8 fili; Bus (digitale); Coassiale; Ethernet; Ibrido; IP; RF; Senza fili; Altro
en: Intercom wiring type: 2-wire; 4-wire; 6-wire; 8-wire; Bus (digital); Coaxial; Ethernet; Hybrid; IP; RF; Wireless; Other
bg-BG: Тип окабеляване на домофона: 2-проводен; 4-проводен; 6-жилен; 8-проводен; Цифрова шина; Коаксиален; Ethernet; Хибрид; IP; РЧ; Безжичен; Други
sk-SK: Typ zapojenia interkomunikačného systému: 2-vodičový; 4-vodičový; 6-vodičový; 8-vodičový; Zbernica (digitálna); Koaxiálny; Ethernet; Hybridný; IP; RF; Bezdrôtový; Iné
sv: Intercom-ledningstyp: 2-tråd; 4-tråd; 6-trådig; 8-tråd; Buss (digital); Koaxial; Ethernet; Hybrid; IP; RF; Trådlös; Övrigt
lt-LT: Domofono laidų tipas: 2 laidų; 4 laidų; 6 laidų; 8 laidų; Magistralė (skaitmeninė); Bendraašis; Eternetas; Hibridinė; IP; RF; Belaidis; Kita
ro-RO: Tip cablare interfon: 2 fire; 4 fire; 6 fire; 8 fire; Magistrală (digitală); Coaxială; Ethernet; Hibrid; IP; RF; Fără fir; Altele
ja: インターコム配線タイプ: 2線式; 4線式; 6線式; 8線式; バス（デジタル）; 同軸; イーサネット; ハイブリッド; IP; RF; 無線; その他